Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PRESCRIBED FIRE LIABILITY PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.  Section 14, chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cultural burn” means the intentional application of fire to land by an Indian tribe  or cul-
tural fire practitioner  to achieve cultural goals or objectives identified by a tribal ordinance, tradi-
tional tribal custom or law  of an Indian tribe, such as subsistence, ceremonial activities, biodiversity
or other benefits.
(b) “Cultural fire practitioner” means a person associated with an  Indian tribe with experience
in burning to meet cultural goals or  objectives, including subsistence, ceremonial activities,
biodiversity or other benefits.
(c) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall  establish a Prescribed Fire Liability Pilot Program and
administer the program.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the Department  of Consumer and Business
Services shall administer reimbursements for claims under the program.
(4) The program must be administered to:
(a) Increase the pace and scale of the use of prescribed fire and cultural burning.
(b) Reduce barriers for conducting prescribed fires and cultural burning.
(c) Support coverage  for losses from prescribed fires and cultural burning by nonpublic entities
such as cultural fire practitioners, private landowners, nongovernmental entities, Certified  Burn
Managers as defined in ORS 526.005, companies, contractors and operators.
(d) Support nonpublic  entities, such as cultural fire practitioners, private landowners, nongov-
ernmental entities, Certified Burn  Managers, companies, contractors and operators, that are alleged
to have caused damages resulting from prescribed fires or cultural burning.
(5) Under the program, the Department of Consumer and Business Services may reimburse
[claims related to ] a claim that meets the following criteria :
(a) The claim relates to:
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-A) Page 1
[(a)] (A)  A prescribed fire conducted or supervised by the State Forester, a forest protective
association or a rangeland protection association, pursuant to ORS 477.315 to 477.325[ .];
[(b)] (B)  A  prescribed fire in a forest protection district, as described in ORS 477.205 to 477.281,
that is conducted or supervised by a Certified Burn Manager pursuant to ORS 526.360[ .]; or
[(c)] (C) A cultural burn conducted or supervised by a cultural fire practitioner[ .];
(b) The claim relates to a prescribed fire or  cultural burn conducted in accordance with
the provisions of any applicable burn plan or  permit and any other applicable conditions or
requirements;
(c) The claim is:
(A) For economic and property damage, as defined in ORS 477.089, suffered  by the
claimant as a result of the prescribed fire or cultural burn; or
(B) If the claimant is  the State Forester or a forest protective association or agency, for
the actual costs incurred by the  claimant in controlling or extinguishing the prescribed fire
or cultural burn, but only to  the extent that such costs would be recoverable from an owner
or operator of forestland pursuant to ORS 477.068 and 477.120; and
(d) The claimant was not willful, malicious  or negligent in the origin or subsequent
spread of the prescribed fire or cultural burn.
(6) The  Department of Consumer and Business Services may [ only] reimburse a claim [ for re-
coverable damages, as described in ORS 477.089 (2), or for actual costs, as described  in ORS 477.068,
subject to the provisions of ORS 477.120, if: ] under the program  only if the State Forestry De-
partment certifies that the claim meets the criteria  described in subsection (5) of this sec-
tion.
[(a) The State Forester, a  forest protective association, a rangeland protection association or a
Certified Burn Manager reviewed and approved a burn plan before the  prescribed fire or cultural
burning;]
[(b) Any necessary permit was  obtained before the prescribed fire or cultural burning was con-
ducted;]
[(c) The prescribed fire or cultural burning complied with any requirements under a burn  plan or
permit;]
[(d) The claim was submitted to the Department of Consumer and Business Services not more than
60 days after an incident report was completed or as specified by rule  by the State Forestry Depart-
ment; and]
[(e) The State  Forestry Department has certified that the claim satisfies the requirements of para-
graphs (a) to (d) of this subsection. ]
(7)(a) [ The limitations  imposed by ORS 30.271 apply to claims under this section ] The amount
paid from the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund established  by section 15, chapter 611, Oregon
Laws 2023, for any claim  for  losses arising from a prescribed fire or cultural burn  may not exceed
$1,000,000.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(A) The amount paid for all claims under the program may not exceed the amount in the
fund.
(B) Awards for claims under the program may be reduced if moneys in the  fund are in-
sufficient to pay the claims.
(C) This section does not limit the ability of a person to assert a  claim for losses arising
from a prescribed fire or cultural burn  under any other law in lieu of asserting a claim under
this section.
(8) The State Forestry Department:
(a) Shall consult with other relevant state agencies,  cultural fire practitioners, [ the State
Forester, ] forest protective associations, rangeland protection associations  and Certified Burn Man-
agers to establish guidelines for the program.
(b) Shall adopt the guidelines by rule.
(c) Shall make the guidelines publicly available on a department website.
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-A) Page 2
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this  section, shall adopt rules to determine how claims
under the program will be accepted and processed.
(e) Shall adopt by rule a definition of the term “prescribed fire”  for purposes of implementing
this section.
(f) Shall adopt rules  establishing requirements for incident reports for prescribed fires and cul-
tural burning.
(g) May adopt rules imposing requirements for eligibility for reimbursement of a claim  under
this section that  are in addition to eligibility requirements described in subsection (6) of this section.
(9) A person who interacts with  an Indian tribe or cultural fire practitioner pursuant to this
section shall respect tribal sovereignty, customs and culture.
[(10) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the state’s liability for all claims under this
section and the  guidelines developed by the State Forestry Department pursuant to subsection (8) of this
section, shall be limited as  described in this section and to the amount in the Prescribed Fire Claims
Fund established by section 15 of this 2023 Act. ]
[(11)] (10) The provisions of ORS 183.310 to 183.497 do not  apply to rules adopted under this
section.
[(12)] (11) This section does not undermine or diminish the exercise of tribal sovereignty.
SECTION 2.  Section 15, chapter 611, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to  the fund.
All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Consumer and Business
Services for the program described in section 14 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 611, Oregon  Laws
2023.
(2) The fund shall consist of all moneys credited  to the fund, including moneys appropriated or
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
[(3) If the department  authorizes the Oregon Insurance Guaranty Association to administer the
program, the department shall distribute moneys in the fund to the association as necessary for  the
program.]
FIRE HARDENING GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 3. The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall allow a person  to
apply for a grant under the Fire Hardening Grant Program on or before December 31, 2025.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. On or before September 15, 2024, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services and the Department of the  State Fire Marshal shall report, in the manner pre-
scribed in ORS 192.245, to committees or interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly
related to natural resources on a proposal for a proactive home hardening program.
HEALTH SYSTEMS FOR SMOKE
SECTION 6.  ORS 468A.836 is amended to read:
468A.836. (1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall establish and implement a program
to support communities across this state in monitoring,  interpreting and communicating data related
to ambient air quality conditions caused by [ wildfire] smoke.
(2) As part of the program, the department shall:
(a) Conduct community outreach in areas of this state that are prone to poor air quality  at-
tributable to [ elevated levels of particulate matter ] smoke events .
(b) Deploy air quality monitoring equipment in a  manner sufficient to evaluate [ an increased
prevalence of poor air quality attributable to elevated levels of particulate matter ] smoke events .
(c) Monitor meteorological conditions in a manner sufficient to forecast [ occurrences  of poor air
quality] smoke impacts .
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-A) Page 3
CAPTIONS
SECTION 7. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. This 2024 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4016 (HB 4016-A) Page 4